Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,140
District funds; depository designated; deposits subject to check or order.

Before such funds are deposited one or more banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions shall be designated by the board of directors of the irrigation district whose funds are to be so deposited. All such deposits shall be subject to payment on check or order of the treasurer of the district. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1935, c. 18, § 2, p. 93;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-1,105;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,140;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 28;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 32.